src/esu.lexc
LEXICON VerbPostbase
VerbInflection;

-[V→N]-[N][Rel][SgUnpd]:%%%:(e)m              EncliticOrEnd; ! V-ing (understood in nominal sense); V-ness
-@+paa|~vaa[V][XCLM]:@⁵+p|~vaa          EncliticOrEnd; ! oh, how V!; my, how V!
-@+pag|~vag[V][XCLM]:@⁵+p|~vag          EncliticOrEnd; ! (HBC form) oh, how V!; my, how V!

-–lria|@ngur*[V→N]:–lria|@⁴+ngur*             NounPostbase; ! the one who is V-ing
!-–lria[V→N]:–lria                             NounPostbase; ! the one who is V-ing
!-–lrii[V→N]:–lrii                             NounPostbase; ! the one who is V-ing (used with endings %:(e)m, %:(e)t, and all dual endings)
!-@ngur*[V→N]:@⁴ngur*                          NounPostbase; ! one that is V; one that is V-ing

-–a|–ar|–aa|+a|+aar[V→V]:+a|+aar              VerbPostbase; ! to V repeatedly
-+`(g)aqe[V→V]:+`(g)aqe                       VerbPostbase; ! to usually V; to repeatedly V; to habitually V
-+`(g)ar(ar)[V→V]:+`(g)ar(ar)                 VerbPostbase; ! to just barely V; to hardly V; to gradually V; leisurely V; With adjectival verbs ending in te-, this postbase means to be a little V
-@+(g)ar(ar)te1[V→V]:@+–`(g)ar(ar)te          VerbPostbase; ! to suddenly or immediately V; to V with short duration of action
-+`(g)arkaqe[V→V]:+`(g)arkaqe                 VerbPostbase; ! will V (it); should V (it); to V (it) in the future
-+`(g)arkau[V→V]:+`(g)arkau                   VerbPostbase; ! will eventually V or be V-ed; should V or be V-ed; is supposed to V or be V-ed; to V in the future
-+`(g)arkaunrir[V→V]:+`(g)arkaunrir           VerbPostbase; ! to now be unable to V; to not be able or fit to V in the V future
-+aur(ar)[V→V]:+aur(ar)                       VerbPostbase; ! to continue V-ing over a period of time
-@~+caar(ar)[V→V]:@⁴~+caar(ar)                VerbPostbase; ! to endeavor to V, to undertake the act of V-ing, to try to V (with a high probability of success)
-@+car[V→V]:@+car                             VerbPostbase; ! to cause to V, to try to induce to V
-@~+cetaar[V→V]:@⁵~+cetaar                    VerbPostbase; ! to try to cause one to V
-@+cete1|.vkar[V→V]:@⁵+cete|.vkar             VerbPostbase; ! to let, allow, permit, cause, or compel one to V
-@~+ciar(ar)[V→V]:@⁵~+ciar(ar)                VerbPostbase; ! to wait patiently for object to V
-+(s)ciigali[V→V]:+(s)ciigali                 VerbPostbase; ! to not be able to V any longer
-+(s)ciigalli[V→V]:+(s)ciigalli               VerbPostbase; ! (additional NI form) to not be able to V any longer
-+(s)ciigate[V→V]:+(s)ciigate°                VerbPostbase; ! to not be able to V
-@%:(u)ciirute[V→V]:@³%:(u)ciirute            VerbPostbase; ! to become unknowing concerning whether or how one is V-ing
-@%:(u)ciite[V→V]:@³%:(u)ciite°               VerbPostbase; ! to not know whether one is V-ing, to not know how one is with respect to V-ing
-–cilli[V→V]:–cilli                           VerbPostbase; ! to appear to have been V-ing; to appear to have been V-ed
-+ciqe|@ciiqe[V→V]:+ciqe|@⁵ciiqe              VerbPostbase; ! to V in the future; will V
-+ciqiar|@ciiqiar[V→V]:+ciqiar|@⁵ciiqiar      VerbPostbase; ! to be about to V; to be going to V
-+ciqli|@ciiqli[V→V]:+ciqli|@⁵ciiqli          VerbPostbase; ! to probably be going to V
-@~+cir1[V→V]:@⁵~+cir                         VerbPostbase; ! to let (it) V; to wait for (it) to V; to make (it) V
-+(s)cir2[V→V]:+(s)cir                        VerbPostbase; ! to get V-ed (usually to oneʼs detriment)
-+(s)ciryar[V→V]:+(s)ciryar                   VerbPostbase; ! to be easily V-ed
-@~+citaar[V→V]:@⁵~+citaar                    VerbPostbase; ! to try to cause one to V
-@+cite1[V→V]:@⁵+cite                         VerbPostbase; ! to let, allow, permit, cause, compel one to V
-+cite2[V→V]:+cite°                           VerbPostbase; ! to have the quality of V or N
-@%:(u)cite3[V→V]:@³%:(u)cite                 VerbPostbase; ! to V in place of, instead of, or for (him) (but not in the sense of ‘for the sake ofʼ)
-+(s)ciur[V→V]:+(s)ciur                       VerbPostbase; ! to get V-ed (usually to oneʼs detriment)
-@–ckegg[V→V]:@⁵–ckegg                        VerbPostbase; ! to be very V, to have good N
-–curlag[V→V]:–curlag                         VerbPostbase; ! to be interfered with while V-ing; to V with unsatisfactory results
-@+(r|l)i1[V→V]:@+(r|l)i                      VerbPostbase; ! to become or cause to become V
-+`(g)i2[V→V]:+`(g)i                          VerbPostbase; ! to V something; to do some V-ing; to suffer the V-ing of something
-@~+(ng)iinar[V→V]:@²~+(ng)iinar              VerbPostbase; ! to V more and more
-%:(ng)illiqe[V→V]:%:(ng)illiqe               VerbPostbase; ! to suffer from the lack of N or V
-–inar[V→V]:–inar                             VerbPostbase; ! to finally V
-%:(ng)ir2[V→V]:%:(ng)ir                      VerbPostbase; ! to deprive or be deprived of N; to remove N from; to un-V; to pass through the N area of (it)
-%:(ng)i%:rute[V→V]:%:(ng)i%:rute             VerbPostbase; ! to not have N any more; to no longer be V (adjectival verbs only)
-%:(ng)ite1[V→V]:%:(ng)ite°                   VerbPostbase; ! to lack N or V; to have no N or V
-–kaca(g)ar[V→V]:–kacaġar                     VerbPostbase; ! to be very V
-–kacagar[V→V]:–kacagar                       VerbPostbase; ! to be very V
-–kacgar[V→V]:–kacgar                         VerbPostbase; ! to be very V
-+kaniir(ar)[V→V]:+kaniir(ar)                 VerbPostbase; ! to become more V
-+kanir[V→V]:+kanir                           VerbPostbase; ! to V more with greater intensity
-+kanir(ar)[V→V]:+kanir(ar)                   VerbPostbase; ! to V more and more, with greater intensity
-–@kaunrir[V→V]:–@⁴k̲aunrir                    VerbPostbase; ! to be unable to V on account of some inhibiting factor
-–kayag[V→V]:–kayag                           VerbPostbase; ! to V (of “darned” one, one toward whom the speaker has negative feelings)
-–keckacagar[V→V]:–keckacagar                 VerbPostbase; ! to be very V
-@–ke3[V→V]:@⁴–ke                             VerbPostbase; ! to find (it) to be V
-@~–kenge[V→V]:@⁵~–kenge                      VerbPostbase; ! to V something
-–knig[V→V]:–knig                             VerbPostbase; ! to suddenly V (motion)
-–ksaar(ar)[V→V]:–ksaar(ar)                   VerbPostbase; ! to V in a small and unnoticeable way
-–ksaite[V→V]:–k̲saite°                        VerbPostbase; ! to not have V-ed (yet)
-–ksaitelar[V→V]:–k̲saitelar                   VerbPostbase; ! (K, BB form) to have never V-ed
-–ksaitlar[V→V]:–k̲saitlar                     VerbPostbase; ! (Y form) to have never V-ed
-–ksuar(ar)[V→V]:–k̲suar(ar)                   VerbPostbase; ! to V in a small and not very noticeable way
-–ksuar(ar)[V→V]:–ksuar(ar)                   VerbPostbase; ! to V in a small and not very noticeable way
-–kugte[V→V]:–kugte                           VerbPostbase; ! to be about to V; to be going to V; to plan to V
-–kuna[V→V]:–kuna                             VerbPostbase; ! to plan to V
-–kunayaaqe[V→V]:–kunayaaqe                   VerbPostbase; ! to consider V-ing; to think about V-ing
-–kutag[V→V]:–kutag                           VerbPostbase; ! to maybe be going to V; to probably V
-–kutar(ar)[V→V]:–kutar(ar)                   VerbPostbase; ! to plan to V
-–laag[V→V]:–laag                             VerbPostbase; ! to V quickly; to V in a hurry
-~+lallru[V→V]:~+lallru                       VerbPostbase; ! (Y, UK, NI form) to formerly, regularly have V-ed
-@~+lallru[V→V]:@ˡ~+lallru                    VerbPostbase; ! (NS form) to formerly, regularly have V-ed
-–lallru[V→V]:–lallru                         VerbPostbase; ! (NI, CAN, K, BB, NR, LI, EG form) to formerly, regularly have V-ed
-~+lar[V→V]:~+lar                             VerbPostbase; ! (Y, UK, NI form) to V customarily; to V regularly
-@~+lar[V→V]:@ˡ~+lar                          VerbPostbase; ! (NS form) to V customarily; to V regularly

LEXICON Exceptions
ella-?pag[N→V]:ellar+vag     VerbPostbase; !
LEXICON VerbBase
aga                    VerbPostbase; ! to hang; to be suspended
aitaupag               VerbPostbase; ! to yawn a big yawn
akuruar                VerbPostbase; ! to carry
alingtar               VerbPostbase; ! to be cowardly; to be very timid
amller                 VerbPostbase; ! to be much; to be many; to be numerous; to be lots; to be enough
angertur               VerbPostbase; ! to chew gum
ante                   VerbPostbase; ! to put out(side)
aqlatlag               VerbPostbase; ! to begin to blow (of wind)
arucetaar              VerbPostbase; ! to chew on a dried fish skin
atanirtur              VerbPostbase; ! to govern; to rule
avayig                 VerbPostbase; ! for weather condition or the like to make easier to see (than before)
ayani                  VerbPostbase; ! to have stamina; to have endurance
cakaar                 VerbPostbase; ! to disregard; to pay great attention and respect (meaning in BB)
cangur                 VerbPostbase; ! lacking symmetry
cauyarcir              VerbPostbase; ! to give various small gifts to the two messengers associated with the “Kevgiq” (“Messenger Feast”)
cevv'ar                VerbPostbase; ! to emerge into an open area; to come out into the open
cingartur              VerbPostbase; ! to ask for the bestowing of special favors usually through grandchildren
ciumuar                VerbPostbase; ! to go forward; to be persistent; to do something though told not to
cumigte                VerbPostbase; ! to hurry; to be anxious; to be relentless; to be persistent; to be preoccupied; to inquisitively look around (NUN meaning)
elingrake              VerbPostbase; ! to be grateful to
engyurte               VerbPostbase; ! to go over a hill or knoll
evu                    VerbPostbase; ! to pile up (usually of ice, as when floes on the water slide up on top of one another)
ill'arte               VerbPostbase; ! to be separate from the others; to be apart fom the others; to be somewhat isolated at the upper or lower end of a village
irniqu                 VerbPostbase; ! to suddenly cave in (of a pit that is being dug)
kanagtu                VerbPostbase; ! to have long legs
kegginaqur             VerbPostbase; ! to put on or wear a mask
kiikiar                VerbPostbase; ! to tell to hurry
kusgur                 VerbPostbase; ! to be protective (of oneʼs young); to provide compassionate assistance; to take pity (on); to help
malrupegte             VerbPostbase; ! to have double vision
matngallaga            VerbPostbase; ! to jolt
meq'urtua              VerbPostbase; ! to be unable to breathe because of a strong wind blowing in oneʼs face
naklegtar              VerbPostbase; ! to be a compassionate person; to be a caring person; to be merciful
nataqii                VerbPostbase; ! to be convicted (of a crime)
neqte                  VerbPostbase; ! to catch fish
nungute                VerbPostbase; ! to fasten a button or other garment fastener; to sew it closed
paqumiyug              VerbPostbase; ! to be curious
picilir                VerbPostbase; ! to accuse falsely
piyugnga               VerbPostbase; ! to be able
qagpag                 VerbPostbase; ! to explode violently
qanugpag               VerbPostbase; ! to snow heavily
qelu                   VerbPostbase; ! to pull up; to tighten; to be cramped of a muscle
qilleryug              VerbPostbase; ! to have an asthma attack
qungelra               VerbPostbase; ! to crouch; to curl up; to be huddled
suvrir                 VerbPostbase; ! to examine
tangvaur(ar)           VerbPostbase; ! to stare
tenguqlirte            VerbPostbase; ! to have a feverish, throbbing pain; to be puffy and sick-looking
tuqungnaqe             VerbPostbase; ! to try to kill
ull'ute                VerbPostbase; ! to collapse on the people in the building as during an earthquake
up'nerkar              VerbPostbase; ! to become spring
uuyurte                VerbPostbase; ! to have a rash, such as a diaper rash; to become raw and irritated from constant moisture of flesh
